Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2169
Action by private person; costs.

Private persons suing out writs of mandamus, under the provisions of sections 25-2156 to 25-2168, shall be liable for costs as in civil cases.

R.S.1867, Code § 3, p. 279;

R.S.1913, § 8284;

C.S.1922, § 9237;

C.S.1929, § 20-2169;

R.S.1943, § 25-2169.